Utah statutes.
35A-8-101.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Accessible housing" means housing which has been constructed or modified to be accessible, as described in the State Construction Code or an approved code under Title 15A, State Construction and Fire Codes Act.

(2)  "Director" means the director of the division.

(3)  "Division" means the Housing and Community Development Division.

